California statutes. Education Code
 average daily attendance of more than 140 and less than or equal to 550, and 88 percent is designated for applicants with total average daily attendance of more than 550, unless otherwise determined by the K–12 Selection Committee formed pursuant to Section 88829, in consultation with the consortium. For any applicant consisting of more than one school district, county office of education, charter school, or regional occupational center or program (ROCP) operated by a joint powers authority or county office of education, or any combination of those entities, the sum of the average daily attendance for each of the constituent entities shall be used for purposes of this subdivision.

(3) The chancellor’s office shall provide to the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the Department of Finance, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office a schedule of proposed allocations, as determined pursuant to paragraph (1), for each consortium no later than August
 30 of each year. The Department of Finance shall approve the allocation plan before the release of funding.

(d) Funds appropriated in the annual Budget Act to support consortia administrative costs shall be apportioned by the chancellor’s office in an amount equal to 1 percent of each consortium’s K–12 allocation pursuant to this section to support the costs to administer the regional grant process and to support the duties of the K–12 Selection Committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 51, Sec. 59.   (SB 75)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

88828.

This section applies to the K–12 component only. Each consortium shall administer a competitive grant program to distribute funding allocated pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 88827 to eligible grant recipients. Consortia are encouraged to collaboratively develop a uniform grant application process that includes a process for grant renewals and for a grant applicant to appeal a grant award decision of the K–12 Selection Committee. As part of the application process, each consortium shall ask applicants to indicate whether they have received a grant under the California Career Technical Education Incentive Grant Program established pursuant to Chapter 16.5 (commencing with Section 53070) of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2. For each fiscal year, the chancellor’s
 office shall work with the State Department of Education to produce a list of grant recipients that receive funding under this program as well as through the California Career Technical Education Incentive Grant Program, including the grant amounts awarded through each program and the purpose for which each grant was awarded. Local educational agencies applying to receive a grant from a consortium shall comply with all of the following:

(a) The local educational agency shall be located within the geographical boundaries of the consortium, and engage in regional efforts to align workforce, employment, and education services.

(b) The local educational agency shall use its consortium’s plan developed pursuant to Section 88823 to inform their efforts to create, support,
 implement, or expand upon career technical education courses, course sequences, programs, and pathways, and to the extent possible, integrate available local, regional, state, and private resources to improve the successful outcomes of pupils enrolled in career technical education courses, course sequences, programs, and pathways. To the extent an applicant’s career technical education program, or programs, offered in the 2018–19 fiscal year do not align with its consortium’s plan developed pursuant to Section 88823, the applicant shall be deemed to meet this requirement by including in its grant application the steps that it will take during the 2018–19 fiscal year to align its career technical education program, or programs, with its consortium’s plan.

(c) (1) The local educational
 agency shall provide matching funds for any grant funding received from this program as follows:

(A) For regional occupational centers or programs operated by a joint powers authority or county office of education, one dollar ($1) for every one dollar ($1) received from this program.

(B) For local educational agencies, two dollars ($2) for every one dollar ($1) received from this program.

(2) The local match may include funding from school district and charter school local control funding formula apportionments pursuant to Section 42238.02, the federal Strengthening Career and Technical Education for the 21st Century Act (Perkins V) (Public Law 115-224), the partnership academies program pursuant to Article 5 (commencing
 with Section 54690) of Chapter 9 of Part 29 of Division 4 of Title 2, the agricultural career technical education incentive program pursuant to Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 52460) of Chapter 9 of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2, or any other allowable source, except as provided in paragraph (3).

(3) The local match described in this subdivision shall not include any funding received by the applicant from the California Career Pathways Trust established pursuant to Section 53010, the California Career Technical Education Incentive Grant Program established pursuant to Section 53070, or the Career Technical Education Facilities Program established pursuant to Section 17078.72.

(4) An applicant’s matching funds shall be used to support the program, or
 programs, for which the applicant was awarded a grant.

(d) The applicant, or the applicant’s career technical education program, as applicable, shall meet all of the following minimum eligibility standards:

(1) Is informed by, aligned with, and expands upon regional plans and planning efforts occurring through the Strong Workforce Program.

(2) Offers high-quality curriculum and instruction aligned with the California Career Technical Education Model Curriculum Standards adopted by the State Board of Education pursuant to Section 51226, including, but not limited to, providing a coherent sequence of career technical education courses that enable pupils to transition to postsecondary education or training programs that lead
 to a career pathway or attain employment upon graduation from high school.

(3) Provides pupils with quality career exploration and guidance.

(4) Provides pupil support services, including, but not limited to, counseling and leadership development.

(5) Provides opportunities for pupils to participate in after-school, extended-day, and out-of-school internships, competitions, and other work-based learning opportunities.

(6) Leads to an industry-recognized credential or certificate, appropriate postsecondary training or employment, or a postsecondary degree.

(7) Is staffed by skilled teachers or faculty
 and provides professional development opportunities for those teachers or faculty members.

(8) (A) Reports data that can be used by policymakers, local educational agencies, community college districts, and their regional partners to support and evaluate the program,
 including demographic data, disaggregated by race and gender, used to evaluate progress in closing equity gaps in program access and completion, and earnings of underserved demographic groups.

(B) Data reported pursuant to this paragraph shall include, but is not limited to, metrics aligned with the core metrics required by the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128), the College/Career Indicator included in the California School Dashboard, and the quality indicators described in the California State Plan for Career Technical Education required by the federal Strengthening Career and Technical Education for the 21st Century Act (Perkins V), and the following
 metrics, disaggregated by race and gender:

(i) The high school graduation rate.

(ii) The number of pupils completing career technical education coursework.

(iii) The number of pupils obtaining an industry-recognized credential, certificate, license, or other measure of technical skill attainment.

(iv) The number of former pupils employed and the types of businesses in which they are employed.

(v) The number of former pupils enrolled in each of the following:

(I) A postsecondary educational institution, disaggregated by public,
 private nonprofit, and private for-profit institutions.

(II) A state apprenticeship program.

(III) Another form of job training.

(C) No later than November 30 of each fiscal year, the Workforce Pathways Joint Advisory Committee established pursuant to Section 12053 shall review the data metrics specified in subparagraph (B) and make recommendations to the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of both houses of the Legislature and to the Department of Finance as to whether they are the most appropriate metrics to measure and evaluate program outcomes for both new and renewal applicants, and whether other metrics should be included.

(D) Data collected
 pursuant to this section shall be reported by the grant recipient to the State Department of Education and their K–14 Technical Assistance Provider by November 1 immediately following the fiscal year for which the data is being reported. The K–14 Technical Assistance Provider shall annually notify the K–12 Selection Committee in each region of any grant recipient that fails to provide the required outcome data. The K–12 Selection Committee, in consultation with the consortium, may terminate or rescind contracts and grants from grantees that fail to provide the required outcome-based data pursuant to this paragraph.

(E) The State Department of Education shall make the data reported pursuant to subparagraph (D) available to the chancellor’s office on a date to be jointly determined by the State Department of Education and the chancellor’s
 office, to ensure the data is included on the California Community Colleges LaunchBoard data platform.

(F) No later than January 31, 2024, and on or before January 31 every five years thereafter, the State Department of Education shall submit a report, pursuant to Section 53076.2 and this section, to the Department of Finance, the Governor, and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature evaluating the progress that local educational agencies have made in expanding the availability of high-quality, industry-valued career technical education and workforce development opportunities; improving coordination and alignment with postsecondary educational institutions and workforce agencies and programs; and, to the extent possible, the progress in closing equity gaps in program access and
 completion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 145, Sec. 3.   (AB 1929)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

88829.

(a) For purposes of awarding grants under the K–12 component of the Strong Workforce Program, each consortium shall form a K–12 Selection Committee made up of individuals with expertise in K–12 career technical education and workforce development. The K–12 Selection Committee membership shall be composed of all of the following:

(1) Current or former K–12 career technical education teachers and administrators.

(2) Charter school representatives, including representatives of charter schools operating pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 47612.1.

(3) Career guidance counselors.

(4) Representatives of industries that are prioritized by the consortium.

(5) At least one community college faculty or administrator.

(6) Other K–12 education stakeholders, or other stakeholders, as determined by the consortium.

(b) The K–14 Technical Assistance Provider in each consortium shall serve as a consultant to the K–12 Selection Committee.

(c) (1) Decisions governing, or relating to, the distribution of fiscal resources for the K–12 component shall be made exclusively by the K–12 Selection Committee, including selection of grant recipients and specific funding amounts for each grant.

(2) The K–12 Selection Committee shall annually notify the
 Superintendent of Public Instruction, the State Board of Education, the Department of Finance, and the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of both houses of the Legislature of the amount awarded to each grant recipient and the activities to be supported by the grant.

(d) To be eligible to receive a grant, a local educational agency with a representative on the K–12 Selection Committee shall maintain appropriate and transparent internal controls and processes to ensure that the local educational agency representative’s duties and responsibilities are clearly delineated, identified, and distinguished from the duties and responsibilities conferred upon the local educational agency as a grant applicant and recipient.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 98.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

88830.

(a) When determining grant recipients under the K–12 component of the Strong Workforce Program, the K–12 Selection Committee shall consider past performance of grantees before awarding additional funds to those reapplying for grants.

(b) (1) The K–12 Selection Committee shall give positive consideration to each of the following characteristics in an applicant:

(A) Aligned programs serving unduplicated pupils, as defined in Section 42238.02.

(B) Programs that the K–12 Selection Committee, in consultation
 with the consortium, determines most effectively meet the needs of the local and regional economies.

(C) Programs serving pupil subgroups that have higher than average dropout rates, as identified by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(D) Programs located in an area of the state with a high unemployment rate.

(E) Programs serving pupils enrolled at a local educational agency receiving Local Control Funding Formula Equity Multiplier funding pursuant to Section 42238.024, as identified through the stability rate data file produced by the State Department of Education in the prior fiscal year.

(2) When determining grant recipients, the K–12 Selection Committee
 shall give greatest weight to the applicant characteristics included in this subdivision.

(c) The K–12 Selection Committee shall also give positive consideration to programs to the extent they do any of the following:

(1) Successfully leverage one or both of the following:

(A) Existing structures, requirements, and resources of the federal Strengthening Career and Technical Education for the 21st Century Act (Perkins V) (Public Law 115-224), the
 California Partnership Academies pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 54690) of Chapter 9 of Part 29 of Division 4 of Title 2, or the Agricultural Career Technical Education Incentive Program pursuant to Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 52460) of Chapter 9 of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2.

(B) Contributions from industry, labor, and philanthropic sources.

(2) Make significant investments in career technical education infrastructure, equipment, and facilities.

(3) Operate within rural school districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 434, Sec. 1.   (AB 3131)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

88831.

(a) A grant recipient for purposes of the K–12 component may consist of one or more, or any combination, of the following:

(1) School districts.

(2) County offices of education.

(3) Charter schools.

(4) Regional occupational centers or programs operated by a joint powers authority or county office of education, if the application has the written consent of each participating local educational agency.

(b) Each consortium shall work with its K–14 Technical Assistance Provider to provide notice to county offices
 of education, other local educational agencies, middle schools, high schools, and regional occupational centers and programs eligible for grants under this section of the availability of contracts and grants and the process for submitting an application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 51, Sec. 62.   (SB 75)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

88832.

As a condition of receiving funds for purposes of the K–12 component, grant recipients shall do both of the following:

(a) Certify to the K–12 Selection Committee that grant funds received and the matching funds contributed by each local educational agency shall be used solely for the purpose of supporting the program or programs for which the grant is awarded.

(b) Make expenditure data on career technical education programs available for purposes of determining if the grant recipients have met the matching funds requirements specified in subdivision (c) of Section 88828, and for monitoring the use of funds provided pursuant to Section 88827.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 32, Sec. 119.   (AB 1808)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

88833.

(a) (1) Commencing with the 2018–19 fiscal year, the amount appropriated in the annual Budget Act for support of the K–12 Workforce Pathway Coordinators and the K–14 Technical Assistance Providers shall be used to establish a K–12 Workforce Pathway Coordinator within the geographical boundaries of each community college district, unless otherwise determined by the Superintendent of Public Instruction and the chancellor’s office. K–12 Workforce Pathway Coordinators shall be selected through a competitive process jointly administered by the Superintendent of Public Instruction and the chancellor’s office, for the provision of technical assistance and support to local educational agencies in implementing career technical education courses, programs, and pathways under both the California Career Technical
 Education Incentive Grant Program established pursuant to Section 53070 and the K–12 component of the Strong Workforce Program. Duties of the K–12 Workforce Pathway Coordinators selected pursuant to this section include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Providing technical assistance and support to local educational agencies to implement career technical education courses, programs, and pathways and integrate available local, regional, state, and private resources to ensure that pupils will achieve successful workforce outcomes. As part of this duty, each K–12 Workforce Pathway Coordinator, in consultation with the State Department of Education, shall ensure that K–12 career technical education programs are aligned with the California Career Technical Education Model Curriculum Standards adopted by the State Board of Education pursuant to Section 51226.

(B) Collaborating on behalf of the local educational agencies within the region with local community colleges, industry partners, local workforce investment boards, and other relevant agencies or organizations to support and align K–12 career technical education programs. As part of this duty, each K–12 Workforce Pathway Coordinator shall stay current with the needs of K–12 career technical education programs and their regional and local labor markets in order to provide guidance, in collaboration with local educational agencies, to the chancellor’s office, the Strong Workforce regional consortium, and industry representatives.

(C) Acting as first point of contact for local educational agencies, industry representatives, and employers with the intent of assisting local educational agencies to respond to industry needs and facilitating industry connection with K–12 career technical education programs.

(D) Cultivating collaborative communities so that local educational agencies and industry can collaborate and provide peer-to-peer knowledge exchange in areas of common interest to inform the development of high-quality education programs.

(E) Working in conjunction with the Deputy Sector Navigators and State Department of Education Industry Sector Leads to improve linkages and alignment of career education pathways between middle schools, high schools, public postsecondary institutions, and the workforce.

(2) An individual associated with any of the following may apply to serve as a K–12 Workforce Pathway Coordinator, or any of the following may subcontract with an individual with expertise in K–12 education and workforce development to serve as a K–12 Workforce Pathway Coordinator:

(A) School districts.

(B) County offices of education.

(C) Charter schools.

(D) Regional occupational centers or programs operated by a joint powers authority or county office of education.

(3) The Superintendent of Public Instruction and the chancellor’s office shall agree upon an outcome-based assessment that allows for an evaluation of the K–12 Workforce Pathway Coordinators’ ability to perform the duties identified in paragraph (1). Data required for purposes of this evaluation shall be submitted by the K–12 Workforce Pathway Coordinators to the Superintendent of Public Instruction and the chancellor’s office at least annually, commencing in the 2019–20 fiscal year.

(b) (1) Commencing with the 2018–19 fiscal year, the amount appropriated in the annual Budget Act for support of the K–12 Workforce Pathway Coordinators and the K–14 Technical Assistance Providers shall be used to support the activities of the K–14 Technical Assistance Providers established under the California Career Pathways Trust. One K–14 Technical Assistance Provider shall be selected for each consortium through a competitive process jointly administered by the Superintendent of Public Instruction and the chancellor’s office, for the provision of technical assistance and support to local educational agencies in implementing career technical education courses, programs, and pathways under both the California Career Technical Education Incentive Grant Program established pursuant to Section 53070 and the K–12 component of the Strong Workforce Program. Duties of the K–14 Technical Assistance Providers selected pursuant to
 this section include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Providing leadership, guidance, and technical assistance to create, support, expand, and improve career technical education opportunities for local educational agencies. As part of this duty, each K–14 Technical Assistance Provider, in consultation with the State Department of Education, shall ensure that K–12 career technical education programs are aligned with the California Career Technical Education Model Curriculum Standards adopted by the State Board of Education pursuant to Section 51226.

(B) Acting as a liaison between the consortium and the State Department of Education, and serving as a consultant to the K–12 Selection Committee.

(C) Interacting with the K–12 Workforce Pathway Coordinators, the Deputy Sector Navigators, and the State
 Department of Education Industry Sector Leads to improve linkages and career education pathways between middle schools, high schools, public postsecondary institutions, and the workforce.

(D) Identifying professional development opportunities for the K–12 Workforce Pathway Coordinators and educational entities, including educational leaders and counselors.

(E) Regularly facilitating the convening of grantees to develop a network of educators to share best practices and cultivate state resources that can be used by agencies charged with providing assistance within the statewide system of support authorized pursuant to Section 52059.5.

(2) Any of the following may apply to serve as a K–14 Technical Assistance Provider, or subcontract with an individual with expertise in K–12 education and workforce development to serve
 as a K–14 Technical Assistance Provider:

(A) School districts.

(B) County offices of education.

(C) Charter schools.

(D) Regional occupational centers or programs operated by a joint powers authority or county office of education.

(E) Community college districts.

(3) The Superintendent of Public Instruction and the chancellor’s office shall agree upon an outcome-based assessment that allows for an evaluation of the K–14 Technical Assistance Providers’ ability to perform the duties identified in paragraph (1). Data required for purposes of this evaluation shall be submitted by the K–14 Technical Assistance Providers to the
 Superintendent of Public Instruction and the chancellor’s office at least annually, commencing in the 2019–20 fiscal year.

(4) In selecting the K–14 Technical Assistance Providers, the Superintendent of Public Instruction and the chancellor’s office shall give priority to applicants who served as a K–14 Technical Assistance Provider under the California Career Pathways Trust pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 53015.

(c) To promote the successful transition to the K–12 Strong Workforce Program, notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), for the 2018–19 fiscal year only, the amount appropriated in the annual Budget Act for support of the K–12 Workforce Pathway Coordinators and the K–14 Technical Assistance Providers shall also be available for the purposes of integrating the K–12 component into the regional consortia and hiring and developing the K–12 Workforce
 Pathway Coordinators and K–14 Technical Assistance Providers.

(d) Any funds not used for the purposes identified in subdivision (a), (b), or (c) shall be added to the amount appropriated in the annual Budget Act for the K–12 component of the Strong Workforce Program, and provided to each consortium to create, support, or expand career technical education programs at the K–12 level that are aligned with the workforce development efforts occurring through the Strong Workforce Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 51, Sec. 63.   (SB 75)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 54.81. California Community College Guided Pathways Grant Program [88920. - 88922.]

88920.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Students are more likely to graduate on time if they identify a major early on, have a clear outline of the courses required for completion, and are provided consistent ongoing guidance and support throughout their program of study.

(b) California has made investments to improve student outcomes at community colleges by providing student intake and guidance services, requiring colleges to focus on closing achievement gaps, improving foundational skills instruction and placements, providing enhanced student services for pretransfer-level students, and streamlining and simplifying the transfer process to four-year universities.

(c) Providing community colleges with strategic, one-time state investments and technical assistance will enable colleges to integrate existing student-success programs and provide students with predictable course schedules and frequent feedback and support services to ensure that they can complete academic programs more efficiently.

(d) Providing students who are pursuing an associate degree with a full two-year sequence of courses that can serve as a default plan will help to ensure that these students are positioned to complete their program on time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.   (AB 2973)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

88921.

(a) There is hereby established the California Community College Guided Pathways Grant Program under the administration of the chancellor’s office. Grants awarded to community colleges pursuant to this part are intended to ensure all of the following:

(1) Integration of existing student-success programs and services.

(2) Building of capacity at community colleges for data analysis, leadership, planning, and implementation related to institutional change.

(3) Development of clearly structured, coherent guided pathways programs for all entering students for purposes of improving student outcomes, reducing time to
 degree, and increasing the ability of students to obtain high-paying jobs.

(b) The chancellor’s office shall distribute grants, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to community colleges that satisfy the requirements of this part and any programmatic criteria, administrative guidelines, and other requirements developed by the chancellor’s office to implement this part.

(c) For purposes of this part, “chancellor’s office” means the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(d) For purposes of this part, a “guided pathways program” includes all of the following activities and practices:

(1) Clarifying paths to student end goals by doing all of the following:

(A) Simplifying students’ choices with default program maps developed by faculty and advisors for all academic and vocational programs that show students a clear pathway to completion, further education, and employment in fields of importance to the region.

(B) Providing student advising and support services that help students to transition from high school, explore academic and vocational fields, choose a major, and develop a comprehensive academic plan leading to an associate degree for transfer, a career technical education certificate, an associate degree, other community college certificates, or the satisfaction of university transfer requirements.

(C) Establishing transfer pathways through alignment of pathway courses and expected learning outcomes with transfer institutions, to optimize applicability of community college credits to university majors.

(2) Helping students choose and enter a pathway by doing both of the following:

(A) Bridging K-12 to higher education by ensuring early remediation in the final year of high school.

(B) Redesigning traditional remediation as an “on-ramp” to a program of study, which helps students explore academic and career options from the beginning of their college experience, aligns math and other foundation skills coursework with a student’s program of study, and integrates and contextualizes instruction to build academic and nonacademic foundation skills throughout the college-level curriculum, particularly in program “gateway” courses.

(3) Helping students stay on an academic path by doing both of the following:

(A) Implementing procedures and systems, supported by appropriate technology, to monitor students’ progress toward completing their academic plans, to identify students who are at risk of not progressing in a program, and to intervene promptly with advising and other academic supports to help those students to resume progress or to revise their plans.

(B) Embedding academic and nonacademic supports throughout student programs to promote student learning and persistence.

(4) Ensuring students are learning by all of the following:

(A) Establishing program-level learning outcomes that are aligned with the requirements for success in employment and further education in a given field and applying the results of learning outcomes assessments to improve the effectiveness of instruction across programs.

(B) Integrating group projects, internships, and other applied learning experiences to enhance instruction and student success in courses across programs of study.

(C) Ensuring incorporation of effective teaching practice throughout the pathways.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 23, Sec. 14.   (SB 85)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

88922.

(a) From the funds provided for this part, the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall allocate:

(1) Up to 10 percent of the total amount of these funds for statewide assistance and programmatic support to implement this part.

(2) All remaining funds shall be allocated as grants to participating community colleges.

(b) (1) The chancellor’s office shall award grants to participating community colleges from the funds described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) as follows:

(A) Twenty percent of these funds
 shall be awarded equally among all participating colleges.

(B) Thirty-five percent of these funds shall be awarded based on the percentage of full-time equivalent students at each participating college.

(C) Forty-five percent of these funds shall be awarded based on the percentage of students at each participating college that satisfy the requirements to receive federal Pell Grants and the requirements in Section 68130.5.

(2) The chancellor’s office may include additional measures or adjust the allocation percentages in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, of paragraph (1) to accomplish the purposes of this part consistent with paragraph (3).

(3) The chancellor’s office shall notify and receive concurrence from the Department of Finance before including
 additional measures or adjusting the allocation percentages pursuant to paragraph (2) and providing these funds to participating community colleges. The department shall consult with the Legislative Analyst’s Office before determining whether to concur. The Director of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee if the department intends to concur.

(c) Before the chancellor’s office may award grant funds to a participating community college, the college shall demonstrate its commitment to implement a guided pathways framework by completing all of the following:

(1) Submitting a letter to the chancellor’s office signed by, and expressing the commitment of, the president of the governing board of the community college district, the chief executive officer of the college, and the president of the college’s academic senate to adopt a guided pathways model.

(2) Notifying the chancellor’s office that the college has attended an Institutional Effectiveness Partnership Initiative workshop for guided pathways. The chancellor’s office shall ensure that community college representatives have sufficient access to an Institutional Effectiveness Partnership Initiative workshop for guided pathways that provides expert assistance to college representatives in developing a work plan that identifies implementation tasks for each participating college.

(3) (A) Establishing and submitting to the chancellor’s office a work plan outlining the college’s commitment to implement a guided pathways program for all entering students and integrate existing student-success programs operating at the college, including, but not necessarily limited to, the Basic Skills Initiative, the Awards for Innovation in Higher Education Program
 established under Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 66010.96) of Chapter 2 of Part 40 of Division 5, associate degrees for transfer established pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 66745) of Chapter 9.2 of Part 40 of Division 5, zero-textbook-cost degrees established pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 78050) of Chapter 1 of Part 48, the Student Success and Support Program established in Article 1 (commencing with Section 78210) of Chapter 2 of Part 48, student equity plans adopted pursuant to Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 78220) of Chapter 2 of Part 48, the Adult Education Block Grant Program established in Article 9 (commencing with Section 84900) of Chapter 5 of Part 50, and the Strong Workforce Program established in Part 54.5 (commencing with Section 88820).

(B) The work plan shall also include the college’s policies regarding the use of information from high school records and other assessment measures to
 determine each student’s course placement and academic support needs.

(4) Submitting additional information that may be required by the chancellor’s office, including an application developed by the chancellor’s office, to assess a community college’s commitment to implement a guided pathways program.

(d) If the chancellor’s office determines that a participating community college has not sufficiently met the requirements of subdivision (c), the college may access available technical assistance opportunities and revise and resubmit the documentation required pursuant to subdivision (c) after receiving its grant funds.

(e) (1) The chancellor’s office shall establish programmatic criteria to release funding in stages to a participating community college based upon a determination by the
 chancellor’s office that the college is making appropriate progress toward implementing a guided pathways program.

(2) (A) The chancellor’s office shall develop qualitative and quantitative indicators to measure early outcomes of guided pathways programs implemented pursuant to this part. In developing these indicators, the chancellor’s office shall consider existing research regarding credit accumulation, completion of gateway mathematics and English courses, and completion of required courses in an academic program as early indicators of program completion.

(B) The chancellor’s office shall develop college-level indicators measuring the share of entering students who are participating in the activities and practices as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 88921 and the alignment of course offerings with students’ education plans.

(C) Nothing in this paragraph shall preclude the chancellor’s office from using student success metrics that are already available as part of the California Community Colleges Student Success Scorecard, the American Association of Community Colleges Pathways Project, or other existing initiatives.

(f) To the extent feasible, the chancellor’s office shall utilize the structure and processes in place for the California Guided Pathways Project, including, but not limited to, the project’s application, participation agreement, professional development, outcome measures, and technical assistance models.

(g) Participating community colleges may use grant funds to implement guided pathways programs for various limited-term purposes, including, but not necessarily limited to, any, or any combination, including all, of the
 following:

(1) Faculty and staff release time to review and redesign guided pathways programs, instruction, and support services.

(2) Professional development in areas related to guided pathways.

(3) Administrative time to coordinate, communicate, and engage college stakeholders in the process of developing and implementing guided pathways programs.

(4) Upgrades to computer and student information systems to improve tracking of student progress and feedback to students.

(h) Participating community colleges shall not use grant funds to provide instruction or support services to students or for other ongoing operating costs.

(i) (1) The chancellor’s office shall report to the Director of Finance and the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, as follows:

(A) By July 1, 2018, provide a summary of the plans received by the chancellor’s office pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), a summary of activities supported by the funds identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), and a summary of activities related to implementation of this part from the Institutional Effectiveness Partnership Initiative and other existing programs of the chancellor’s office.

(B) By each July 1 from 2019 to 2022, inclusive, provide an updated summary of each community college’s progress toward implementing its plan established pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), including the share of each college’s students engaged in guided pathways activities and
 practices and the college’s alignment of course offerings with student education plans. The annual report due by July 1, 2022, shall include a summary of each participating community college’s progress on the qualitative and quantitative indicators of early outcomes developed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) or as otherwise required by the chancellor’s office.
